New Jersey, session 221, S3890.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  The Commissioner of Human Services, in consultation with the Secretary of Higher Education, shall develop general program information about the federal Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program, including a link to the program application 1and a link to the website for NJ 211, the Statewide information and referral service for health, emergency, and human services resources and assistance1. 2.  Each public institution of higher education shall include with its initial offer of admission and, via email, upon each semesters registration: a.  the information developed pursuant to section 1 of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill); and b.  information on any food assistance, pantry, meal swipe, or similar programs offered by the institution or located in the community. 3. This act shall take effect immediately.